Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 6 ELECTION JUDGES
1-6-122. State employees - leave to serve as election judge.

An employee of a state agency, as defined in section 24-18-102 (9), C.R.S., shall be entitled to take administrative leave with pay on election day for the purpose of serving as an election judge, unless the employee's supervisor determines that the employee's attendance at work on election day is essential.

An employee of a state agency who takes administrative leave with pay to serve as an election judge in accordance with this section shall not receive compensation pursuant to section 1-6-115.

An employee of a state agency who serves as an election judge in accordance with this section shall submit to the employee's supervisor evidence of service as an election judge.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 2032, § 12, effective June 6.